Maryland, session 2025, HB0432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
4–322.
(a) (1) There is a Locally Operated Transit System Grant Program.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0432*

HOUSE BILL 432
(c) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN
CONSUMERS” MEANS THE INDEX PUBLISHED MONTHLY BY THE BUREAU OF LABOR
STATISTICS OF THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR THAT IS THE UNITED STATES
CITY AVERAGE OF ALL ITEMS IN A BASKET OF CONSUMER GOODS AND SERVICES.
(2) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR
ALL URBAN CONSUMERS SHALL BE DETERMINED BY COMPARING THE AVERAGE OF
THE INDEX FOR THE 12 MONTHS ENDING ON THE PRECEDING JUNE 30 TO THE
AVERAGE OF THE INDEX FOR THE PRIOR 12 MONTHS
(3) For fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation from the Transportation Trust Fund of
at least $80,533,314 to the program for statewide program operations.
(4) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE APPROPRIATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE INCREASED BY THE AMOUNT THAT EQUALS THE PRODUCT OF
MULTIPLYING:
(I) THE AMOUNT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO BE
INCLUDED IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR FOR THE
PROGRAM; AND
(II) THE LESSER OF:
1. THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER
PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS; OR
2. 5%.
(5) IF THERE IS A DECLINE OR NO GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS, THE APPROPRIATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF THE APPROPRIATION FOR THE
PRIOR FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.